test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-avaltymasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - авалтымаш: # Noun 'being covered'

     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom: авалтымаш
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Gen: авалтымашын
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Dat: авалтымашлан
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Acc: авалтымашым
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Cmpr: авалтымашла
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Com: авалтымашге
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ine: [авалтымашыште, авалтымаште]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ill: [авалтымашышке, авалтымашке, авалтымашыш]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Lat: авалтымашеш
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Abe: авалтымашде

     авалтымаш+N+LocPl+Nom: авалтымашла
     авалтымаш+N+LocPl+Ine: авалтымашлаште
     авалтымаш+N+LocPl+Ill: [авалтымашлашке, авалтымашлаш]
     авалтымаш+N+LocPl+Lat: авалтымашлаш

     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Nom: авалтымашмыт
     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Gen: авалтымашмытын
     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Dat: авалтымашмытлан
     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Acc: авалтымашмытым
     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Cmpr: авалтымашмытла
     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Com: авалтымашмытге
     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Ine: авалтымашмытыште
     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Ill: [авалтымашмытышке, авалтымашмытыш]
     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Lat: авалтымашмытеш
     авалтымаш+N+AssocPl+Abe: авалтымашмытде

     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Nom: [авалтымаш-влак, авалтымаш-шамыч]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Gen: [авалтымаш-влакын, авалтымаш-шамычын]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Dat: [авалтымаш-влаклан, авалтымаш-шамычлан]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Acc: [авалтымаш-влакым, авалтымаш-шамычым]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Cmpr: [авалтымаш-влакла, авалтымаш-шамычла]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Com: [авалтымаш-влакге, авалтымаш-шамычге]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ine: [авалтымаш-влакыште, авалтымаш-шамычыште]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ill: [авалтымаш-влакышке, авалтымаш-шамычышке, авалтымаш-влакыш, авалтымаш-шамычыш]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Lat: [авалтымаш-влакеш, авалтымаш-шамычеш]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Abe: [авалтымаш-влакде, авалтымаш-шамычде]

     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: авалтымашем
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: авалтымашемын
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [авалтымашемлан, авалтымашланем]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: авалтымашемым
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: [авалтымашемла, авалтымашлам]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: авалтымашемге
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: авалтымашыштем
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: авалтымашышкем
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: авалтымашешем
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: авалтымашемде

     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: авалтымашет
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: авалтымашетын
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: [авалтымашетлан, авалтымашланет]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: авалтымашетым
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: [авалтымашетла, авалтымашлат]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: авалтымашетге
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: авалтымашыштет
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: авалтымашышкет
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2: авалтымашешет 
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: авалтымашетде

     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [авалтымашыже, авалтымашше, авалтымашыж]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [авалтымашшын, авалтымашыжын]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: [авалтымашшылан, авалтымашланже, авалтымашыжлан]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [авалтымашшым, авалтымашыжым]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: [авалтымашшыла, авалтымашлаже, авалтымашыжла]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: [авалтымашшыге, авалтымашыжге]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: [авалтымашыштыже, авалтымашыштыж]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: [авалтымашышкыже, авалтымашышкыж]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: [авалтымашешыже, авалтымашешше, авалтымашешыж]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: [авалтымашшыде, авалтымашыжде]

     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: авалтымашна
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: авалтымашнан
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: [авалтымашналан, авалтымашланна]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: авалтымашнам
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: [авалтымашнала, авалтымашлана]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: авалтымашнаге
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: авалтымашыштына 
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: авалтымашышкына 
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl1: авалтымашешна 
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: авалтымашнаде

     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: авалтымашда
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: авалтымашдан
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: [авалтымашдалан, авалтымашланда]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: авалтымашдам
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: [авалтымашдала, авалтымашлада]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: авалтымашдаге
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: авалтымашыштыда
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: авалтымашышкыда
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl2: авалтымашешда
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: авалтымашдаде

     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: авалтымашышт
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: авалтымашыштын
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: [авалтымашыштлан, авалтымашланышт]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: авалтымашыштым
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: [авалтымашыштла, авалтымашлашт]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: авалтымашыштге
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: авалтымашыштышт
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: авалтымашышкышт
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl3: авалтымашешышт 
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: авалтымашыштде

     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакем, авалтымаш-шамычем, авалтымашем-влак, авалтымашем-шамыч]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакемын, авалтымаш-шамычемын, авалтымашем-влакын, авалтымашем-шамычын]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакемлан, авалтымаш-шамычемлан, авалтымашем-влаклан, авалтымашем-шамычлан, авалтымаш-влакланем, авалтымаш-шамычланем]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакемым, авалтымаш-шамычемым, авалтымашем-влакым, авалтымашем-шамычым]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакемла, авалтымаш-шамычемла, авалтымашем-влакла, авалтымашем-шамычла, авалтымаш-влаклам, авалтымаш-шамычлам]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакемге, авалтымаш-шамычемге, авалтымашем-влакге, авалтымашем-шамычге]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакыштем, авалтымаш-шамычыштем, авалтымашем-влакыште, авалтымашем-шамычыште]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакышкем, авалтымаш-шамычышкем, авалтымашем-влакышке, авалтымашем-шамычышке, авалтымашем-влакыш, авалтымашем-шамычыш]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакешем, авалтымаш-шамычешем, авалтымашем-влакеш, авалтымашем-шамычеш] 
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: [авалтымаш-влакемде, авалтымаш-шамычемде, авалтымашем-влакде, авалтымашем-шамычде]

     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакет, авалтымаш-шамычет, авалтымашет-влак, авалтымашет-шамыч]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакетын, авалтымаш-шамычетын, авалтымашет-влакын, авалтымашет-шамычын]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакетлан, авалтымаш-шамычетлан, авалтымашет-влаклан, авалтымашет-шамычлан, авалтымаш-влакланет, авалтымаш-шамычланет]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакетым, авалтымаш-шамычетым, авалтымашет-влакым, авалтымашет-шамычым]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакетла, авалтымаш-шамычетла, авалтымашет-влакла, авалтымашет-шамычла, авалтымаш-влаклат, авалтымаш-шамычлат]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакетге, авалтымаш-шамычетге, авалтымашет-влакге, авалтымашет-шамычге]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакыштет, авалтымаш-шамычыштет, авалтымашет-влакыште, авалтымашет-шамычыште]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакышкет, авалтымаш-шамычышкет, авалтымашет-влакышке, авалтымашет-шамычышке, авалтымашет-влакыш, авалтымашет-шамычыш]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакешет, авалтымаш-шамычешет, авалтымашет-влакеш, авалтымашет-шамычеш]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: [авалтымаш-влакетде, авалтымаш-шамычетде, авалтымашет-влакде, авалтымашет-шамычде]

     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакше, авалтымаш-шамычше, авалтымашыже-влак, авалтымашыже-шамыч, авалтымашыж-влак, авалтымашыж-шамыч, авалтымашше-влак, авалтымашше-шамыч]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакшын, авалтымаш-шамычшын, авалтымашыже-влакын, авалтымашыже-шамычын, авалтымашыж-влакын, авалтымашыж-шамычын, авалтымашше-влакын, авалтымашше-шамычын]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакшылан, авалтымаш-шамычшылан, авалтымашыже-влаклан, авалтымашыже-шамычлан, авалтымаш-влакланже, авалтымаш-шамычланже, авалтымашыж-влаклан, авалтымашыж-шамычлан, авалтымашше-влаклан, авалтымашше-шамычлан]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакшым, авалтымаш-шамычшым, авалтымашыже-влакым, авалтымашыже-шамычым, авалтымашше-влакым, авалтымашше-шамычым, авалтымашыж-влакым, авалтымашыж-шамычым]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакшыла, авалтымаш-шамычшыла, авалтымашыже-влакла, авалтымашыже-шамычла, авалтымаш-влаклаже, авалтымаш-шамычлаже, авалтымашыж-влакла, авалтымашыж-шамычла, авалтымашше-влакла, авалтымашше-шамычла]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакшыге, авалтымаш-шамычшыге, авалтымашыже-влакге, авалтымашыже-шамычге, авалтымашыж-влакге, авалтымашыж-шамычге, авалтымашше-влакге, авалтымашше-шамычге]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакыштыже, авалтымаш-шамычыштыже, авалтымашыже-влакыште, авалтымашыже-шамычыште, авалтымашыж-влакыште, авалтымашыж-шамычыште, авалтымашше-влакыште, авалтымашше-шамычыште]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакышкыже, авалтымаш-шамычышкыже, авалтымашыже-влакышке, авалтымашыже-шамычышке, авалтымашыже-влакыш, авалтымашыже-шамычыш, авалтымашыж-влакышке, авалтымашыж-шамычышке, авалтымашыж-влакыш, авалтымашыж-шамычыш, авалтымашше-влакышке, авалтымашше-шамычышке, авалтымашше-влакыш, авалтымашше-шамычыш]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакешыже, авалтымаш-шамычешыже, авалтымашыже-влакеш, авалтымашыже-шамычеш, авалтымашыж-влакеш, авалтымашыж-шамычеш, авалтымашше-влакеш, авалтымашше-шамычеш]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: [авалтымаш-влакшыде, авалтымаш-шамычшыде, авалтымашыже-влакде, авалтымашыже-шамычде, авалтымашше-влакде, авалтымашше-шамычде, авалтымашыж-влакде, авалтымашыж-шамычде]

     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакна, авалтымаш-шамычна, авалтымашна-влак, авалтымашна-шамыч]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакнан, авалтымаш-шамычнан, авалтымашна-влакын, авалтымашна-шамычын]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакналан, авалтымаш-шамычналан, авалтымашна-влаклан, авалтымашна-шамычлан, авалтымаш-влакланна, авалтымаш-шамычланна]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакнам, авалтымаш-шамычнам, авалтымашна-влакым, авалтымашна-шамычым]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакнала, авалтымаш-шамычнала, авалтымашна-влакла, авалтымашна-шамычла, авалтымаш-влаклана, авалтымаш-шамычлана]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакнаге, авалтымаш-шамычнаге, авалтымашна-влакге, авалтымашна-шамычге]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакыштына, авалтымаш-шамычыштына, авалтымашна-влакыште, авалтымашна-шамычыште]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакышкына, авалтымаш-шамычышкына, авалтымашна-влакышке, авалтымашна-шамычышке, авалтымашна-влакыш, авалтымашна-шамычыш]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакешна, авалтымаш-шамычешна, авалтымашна-влакеш, авалтымашна-шамычеш] 
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: [авалтымаш-влакнаде, авалтымаш-шамычнаде, авалтымашна-влакде, авалтымашна-шамычде]
